Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-741
Board; meetings; chairperson; quorum.

The members of the board shall conduct an annual meeting in July of each year, or at such other time as the board determines, and shall elect a chairperson from their members at the annual meeting. Other meetings of the board shall be held when called with at least seven days' notice to all members by the chairperson of the board or pursuant to a call signed by four other members. Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Laws 1988, LB 863, § 5;

Laws 1998, LB 395, § 18.